Maine, session 132, LD408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2706, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Disclosure of records regarding certain minors. Certified or noncertified
copies of vital records of an unaccompanied minor or emancipated minor must be made
available to the minor and other individuals in accordance with the requirements of
subsection 5 or, with the written permission of the minor, to the director of an emergency
shelter program, runaway or homeless youth services organization or continuum of care
agency at which the minor is a client, or the director's designee, or to a social worker, school
administrator or teacher providing services to the minor. The state registrar shall make
available the vital records of an unaccompanied minor or emancipated minor to the minor
at no cost. For the purposes of this subsection, "unaccompanied minor" means a person
who has not attained 18 years of age who is not accompanied by a parent or guardian at the
time that the minor makes the request to obtain the minor's vital records or gives written
permission for a person authorized under this subsection to receive the records on the
minor's behalf. For the purposes of this subsection, "emancipated minor" means an
individual ordered emancipated in accordance with Title 15, section 3506-A.
Page 1 - 132LR0909(03)